District of Columbia statutes.
22-3055

Exclusions.

(a)

This chapter shall not apply to:

(1)

Constitutionally protected activity; or

(2)

A person disclosing or publishing a sexual image that resulted from the voluntary exposure of the person depicted in a public or commercial setting.

(b)

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to impose liability on an interactive computer service, as defined in section 230(e)(2) of the Communications Act of 1934, approved February 8, 1996 (110 Stat. 139; 47 U.S.C. § 230(f)(2)), for content provided by another person.

History

May 7, 2015, D.C. Law 20-275, § 6, 62 DCR 16